North Carolina, session 2025, SB37.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Section 23 of Chapter 988 of the 1965 Session Laws, as amended by
Chapter 931 of the 1969 Session Laws, and by Section 14 of S.L. 2023-143, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 23. This Act shall only apply to the counties of Cherokee, Clay, Graham, Hertford,
Jackson, Macon, Swain, Transylvania, and Yancey."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S37-v-1*